Washington statutes.
RCW 38.38.864

[Art. 141] Process of military courts.

(1) Military courts may issue any process or mandate necessary to carry into effect their powers. Such a court may issue subpoenae and subpoenae duces tecum and enforce by attachment attendance of witnesses and production of books and records, when it is sitting within the state and the witnesses, books and records sought are also so located.

(2) Process and mandates may be issued by summary courts-martial, or the military judge of other military courts and may be directed to and may be executed by the marshals of the military court or any peace officer and shall be in such form as may be prescribed by regulations issued under this code.

(3) All officers to whom process or mandates may be so directed shall execute them and make return of their acts thereunder according to the requirements of those documents. Except as otherwise specifically provided in this code, no such officer may demand or require payment of any fee or charge for receiving, executing, or returning such a process or mandate or for any service in connection therewith.

[ 1989 c 48 s 78; 1963 c 220 s 126.]